Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.100

Principals and vice principals—Employment of—Qualifications—Duties.

School districts may employ public school principals and/or vice principals to supervise the operation and management of the school to which they are assigned. Such persons shall hold valid administrative certificates and shall hold or have held either valid teacher certificates or valid educational staff associate certificates. Persons who hold or have held valid educational staff associate certificates must also have demonstrated successful school-based experience in an instructional role with students. Persons whose certificates were revoked, suspended, or surrendered may not be employed as public school principals or vice principals. In addition to such other duties as shall be prescribed by law and by the job description adopted by the board of directors, each principal shall:

(1) Assume administrative authority, responsibility and instructional leadership, under the supervision of the school district superintendent, and in accordance with the policies of the school district board of directors, for the planning, management, supervision and evaluation of the educational program of the attendance area for which he or she is responsible.

(2) Submit recommendations to the school district superintendent regarding appointment, assignment, promotion, transfer and dismissal of all personnel assigned to the attendance area for which he or she is responsible.

(3) Submit recommendations to the school district superintendent regarding the fiscal needs to maintain and improve the instructional program of the attendance area for which he or she is responsible.

(4) Assume administrative authority and responsibility for the supervision, counseling and discipline of pupils in the attendance area for which he or she is responsible.

[ 2002 c 78 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 272 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.160.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 272: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 272 s 2.]